Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.540

Loan advances—Eligibility and benefits under means-tested programs—Subject to federal law.

(1) To the extent that implementation of this section does not conflict with federal law resulting in the loss of federal funding, proprietary reverse mortgage loan advances made to a borrower must be treated as proceeds from a loan and not as income for the purpose of determining eligibility and benefits under means-tested programs of aid to individuals.

(2) Undisbursed reverse mortgage funds must be treated as equity in the borrower's home and not as proceeds from a loan, resources, or assets for the purpose of determining eligibility and benefits under means-tested programs of aid to individuals.

(3) This section applies to any law or program relating to payments, allowances, benefits, or services provided on a means-tested basis by this state including, but not limited to, optional state supplements to the federal supplemental security income program, low-income energy assistance, property tax relief, aged, blind, or disabled assistance benefits, pregnant women assistance benefits, essential needs and housing support, and medical assistance only to the extent this section does not conflict with Title 19 of the federal social security act.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 36 s 15; 2010 1st sp.s. c 8 s 15; 2009 c 149 s 8.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 36: See RCW 74.62.005.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 36: See note following RCW 74.62.005.

Findings—Intent—Short title—Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 8: See notes following RCW 74.04.225.